th: โปรไฟล์ฟิน: ห้าครีบ; แบบสี่เกลียว; แบบเดี่ยว; ทรัสเตอร์; แบบคู่; อื่นๆ
el: Προφίλ πτερυγίου: Πέντε πτερυγίων; Τετραπλό; Μονό; Προωθητήρας; Διπλό; Άλλο
ko: 핀 프로필: 5핀; 쿼드; 싱글; 트러스터; 트윈; 기타
ro-RO: Profil aripioare: Cinci aripioare; Quad; Simplu; Propulsor; Twin; Altele
fi: Purseprofiili: Viisieväinen; Neljä; Yksittäinen; Työntö; Twin; Muu
bg-BG: Профил на перката: Пет перки; Четворен; Единичен; Тласкач; Двоен; Други
nl: Vinprofiel: Five-fin; Quad; Single; Thruster; Twin; Andere
pt-PT: Perfil de quilhas: Quilha five-fin; Quádruplo; Único; Propulsor; Twin; Outro
it: Profilo della pinna: Five-fin; Quattro; Singolo; Thruster; Twin; Altro
hr-HR: Profil peraje: Pet peraja; Četiri peraje; Jedna peraja; Thruster; Dvije peraje; Ostalo
es: Perfil de aleta: Cinco aletas; Cuádruple; Individual; Propulsor; Doble; Otros
zh-TW: 舵片輪廓: 五舵; 四倍; 單倍; 推進器; 雙舵; 其他
pt-BR: Perfil da nadadeira: Cinco barbatanas; Quádrupla; Único; Propulsora; Estilo duplo; Outro
sv: Fenprofil: Femfenig; Quad; Enkel; Thruster; Tvilling; Övrigt
sk-SK: Profil plutiev: Päťplutvový; Štvoritý; Jeden; Thruster; Dvojposteľ; Iné
fr: Profil de l’aileron: Cinq ailerons; Quadruplé; Unique; Propulseur; Double; Autre
lt-LT: Kylių profilis: Penkių pelekų; Quad; Single; Tripelekė; Twin; Kita
sl-SI: Profil smernika: Petplavutna; Četverni; Enojni; Potisni motor; Dvojna; Drugo
ja: フィンのプロファイル: ファイブフィン; クアッド; シングル; スラスター; ツイン; その他
zh-CN: 鳍板外形: 五鳍; 四倍; 单; 三鳍; 双人; 其他
pl: Profil płetwy: Pięć płetw; Quad; Singiel; Ster strumieniowy; Dwuosobowy; Inne
en: Fin profile: Five-fin; Quad; Single; Thruster; Twin; Other
vi: Biên dạng cánh: Năm vây; Bốn; Đơn; Bộ đẩy; Sinh đôi; Khác
nb: Finneprofil: Femfinne; Quad; Enkel; Thruster; Tvilling; Annet
hu: Uszony profilja: Five-fin; Quad; Szimpla; Thruster; Dupla; Egyéb
da: Finneprofil: Fem finner; Firdobbelt; Enkelt; Thruster; Twin; Andet
tr: Kanat Profili: Beş yüzgeçli; Dörtlü; Tek; İtici; Twin; Diğer
cs: Profil ploutve: Pět ploutviček; Quad; Jedna funkce; Tři ploutvičky; Dvojitý; Jiné
de: Finnenprofil: Five-fin; Vier; Einzel; Thruster; Twin; Sonstiges
ru: Плавники на доске: Пятиплавниковый; Четыре; Одинарный; Двигатель; Двойной; Другой